Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 3. Local Service Roads and Trails.

Sec. 19.30.110.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 84 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 19.30.111.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.251

to provide for the acquisition and construction of local service roads and trails that are not included in the approved federal-aid primary highway systems eligible for federal-state matching funds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1981)

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets and Bridges, § 200 et seq.

40 C.J.S., Highways, § 176 et seq.

Power to directly regulate or prohibit abutter’s access to street or highway. 73 ALR2d 652.

Accidents arising from merger of traffic on limited-access highway with that from service road or ramp. 40 ALR3d 1429.

Measure and elements of damage for limitation of access caused by conversion of conventional road into limited access highway. 42 ALR3d 148.

Sec. 19.30.120.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 84 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 19.30.121.
Regulations.

The commissioner may adopt regulations necessary to carry out AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.241

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For driveway and approach road permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 2.

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

Sec. 19.30.127.
Allocation districts.

The state is divided into five allocation districts as follows:

The boundary of allocation district one begins in Kamishak Bay at 59° 15´ N, 154° 00´W; and travels north along longitude line 154° 00´W to latitude 63° 00´N; thence east along latitude line 63° 00´N to a point common with the boundaries of allocations districts two and five; southerly of the Denali Highway at Corkscrew Creek (Milepost 59.1); thence southerly to Prince William Sound at Fairmount Point 60° 53´45" N, 147° 27´W and inclusive of Kodiak, Afognak, Barren, Trinity, and Chirikof Islands.

The boundary of allocation district two begins at and includes the point at which the Alaska Highway intersects the Alaska-Yukon border; travels northwesterly to the west abutment of the Little Tok River Bridge on Tok Cutoff Highway (Milepost 91.2); thence west to the northerly abutment of the McCallum Creek Bridge on the Richardson Highway (Milestone 202.4); thence west to a point directly north of the Denali Highway at Corkscrew Creek (Milepost 59.1); thence southwesterly to the Glenn Highway at Summit (Milepost 118) and continuing along that line to latitude 63° 00´N; thence west along latitude 63° 00´N; to longitude 154° 00´W; thence north along longitude 154° 00´W to the Arctic Ocean.

The boundary of allocation district three begins in the Gulf of Alaska on longitude line 141° 00´W; thence north along longitude 141° 00´W to Boundary Point 187; thence southeasterly along the Canadian-United States border bounding Southeastern Alaska in its entirety.

The boundary of allocation district four begins in the Arctic Ocean at Smith Bay 70° 54´N, 154° 19´W; on longitude line 154° 00´W; travels south along longitude 154° 00´W to latitude 59° 15´N in Kamishak Bay; thence east along latitude 59° 15´N to longitude 152° 15´W; thence southwesterly through Shelikof Strait and bounds of the entire Aleutian Chain.

The boundary of allocation district five begins at the Gulf of Alaska on longitude line 141° 00´W and travels northerly along that line to the point (but not including the point) at which Alaska Highway intersects the Alaska-Yukon border; thence northwesterly to the west abutment of the Little Tok River Bridge on the Tok Cutoff Highway (Milepost 91.2); thence west to the northerly abutment of McCallum Creek Bridge on the Richardson Highway (Milepost 202.40; thence west to the point directly north of Denali Highway at Corkscrew Creek (Milepost 59.1); thence southwesterly to the Glenn Highway at Summit (Milepost 118); thence southerly to Prince William Sound at Fairmount Point 60° 53´45"N, 147° 27´W.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971)

Sec. 19.30.130.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 84 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 19.30.131.
Allocation of funds.

During each fiscal year the commissioner shall allocate sums appropriated or otherwise designated for expenditure upon local service roads for that fiscal year among the five allocation districts in the following manner: one-half in the ratio that the area of each allocation district bears to the total area of the state and one-half in the ratio that the population of each allocation district bears to the total population of the state as shown by the latest available federal or state census or other census approved by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The commissioner shall also further allocate the sums in each allocation district to the boroughs and unified municipalities within each allocation district in the following manner: one-half in the ratio that the area of each organized borough or unified municipality (excluding salt water areas) within that district bears to the total area of the allocation district and one-half in the ratio that the population of each organized borough area or each unified municipality within that district bears to the total population of the allocation district as shown by the latest available federal or state census or other census approved by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The commissioner shall also further allocate portions of the sum allocated to any organized borough and to any home rule city within the organized borough in the following manner:

one-half in the ratio that the area of each home rule city bears to the total area of the organized borough excluding salt water areas; and

one-half in the ratio that the population of each home rule city bears to the total population of the organized borough as shown by the latest available federal or state census or other census approved by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The sums not allocated within each district to a local government under (b) and (c) of this section shall be allocated to the unorganized borough and administered by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1981; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 5 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(5), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” throughout this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 19.30.140.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 84 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 19.30.141.
Acquisition and construction programs.

Before October 1 of each fiscal year each local government eligible for allocation of funds under AS

19.30.131

shall submit to the commissioner for approval a five-year plan for the acquisition and construction of local service roads and trails. Before December 1 of each fiscal year the commissioner shall submit to the governor a five-year plan for the acquisition and construction of local service roads and trails, including the approved local government programs.
An organized borough shall include in its five-year plan local service road acquisition and construction programs for all cities other than home rule cities within the boundaries of the borough.
The commissioner shall include in the five-year plan local service road and trail acquisition and construction within the unorganized borough.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 5 SLA 1986)

Sec. 19.30.150.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 84 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 19.30.151.
Local government participation.

Upon application by a local government, local service roads and trails constructed under the provisions of AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.241

and located within the jurisdictional boundaries of a local government may be transferred to that local government upon approval by the department and after a vote of the people in the area.

The commissioner shall, upon request of a local government, transfer funds allocated under AS

19.30.131

to any local government that has assumed local road powers for project cost amounts and contract award amounts submitted to the commissioner.

AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.241

do not prohibit a local government from participating financially in the acquisition and construction of a local service road or trail.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am §§ 2, 3 ch 158 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 38 SLA 1981)

Sec. 19.30.160.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 84 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 19.30.161.
Design standards, rights-of-way, and widths.

Design standards, rights-of-way, and widths for each local service road and trail project must have the prior approval of the commissioner, unless the project is under the supervision of a local government that has assumed local road powers. Where approval is required the commissioner must make a decision within 90 days after the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities’ receipt of the local government’s request.
If the project is under the supervision of a local government that has assumed road powers and the project is not located on a federal-aid secondary route, design standards, rights-of-way, and widths shall be established by the local government.
If a project under the supervision of a local government that has assumed road powers is located on a federal-aid secondary route, design standards, rights-of-way, and widths must have the prior approval of the commissioner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 158 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 5 SLA 1986)

Sec. 19.30.170.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 84 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 19.30.171.
Acquisition and conveyance of rights-of-way.

The local government shall acquire all rights-of-way required for local service road and trail construction. However, if the local government is unable to acquire the necessary right-of-way, the commissioner may acquire it in accordance with AS

19.05.080

—

19.05.120

. The commissioner may convey to the local government, by appropriate instrument executed in the name of the state, any land or interest in land which has been acquired by the state for the construction of local service roads or trails.

The costs incurred by the commissioner in acquiring this land or interest in land includes all costs and any fees incidental to acquisition. All costs incurred in connection with the acquisition of the land or interest in land for local governments that have assumed local road powers shall be charged to the project allocation for which the land or interest in land is acquired. Right-of-way acquisition costs incurred by the commissioner for local governments without local road powers under AS

19.30.151(a)

shall be charged to the project allocation for the local government for which the land or interest in land is acquired.

When rights-of-way for local service roads are acquired over land or interest in land owned by the state, the commissioner may make arrangements with the department having jurisdiction over the land as may be necessary to give the local government adequate rights-of-way, and any department having jurisdiction is directed to transfer the jurisdiction of the land to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 17 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 158 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 1981)

Sec. 19.30.181.
Project agreements.

A local government that has assumed local road powers may enter into a formal project agreement with the commissioner for the acquisition and construction of a specific project.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 158 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 38 SLA 1981)

Sec. 19.30.191.
Letting of contracts.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 158 SLA 1980.]

Contracts entered into by a local government that has assumed local road powers for the construction of each project shall be awarded only on the basis of the lowest responsible bid submitted by a bidder meeting established criteria of responsibility.

All contracts by a local government that has not assumed local road powers must have the prior concurrence of the commissioner. The commissioner may delegate the power to approve contracts to a local government that has assumed local road powers for the acquisition and construction of local service roads and trails.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section and in AS

44.33.300

, construction of each project shall be administered by the department in accordance with guidelines established by the commissioner by regulation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 277 SLA 1976; am §§ 7 — 9, 15 ch 158 SLA 1980; am §§ 7, 8 ch 38 SLA 1981)

Sec. 19.30.201.
Construction.

Except as provided under AS

19.30.161

, the construction of a local service road or trail undertaken by the department or under its direct supervision under the provisions of AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.241

shall be performed according to approved design standards and is subject to the inspection and approval of the commissioner.
All construction work done and labor performed by or under the direct supervision of the department shall be in accordance with applicable state law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 10 ch 158 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 38 SLA 1981)

Sec. 19.30.211.
Maintenance.

The department shall maintain, or cause to be maintained, any project constructed by the department under the provisions of AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.241

, except that upon mutual agreement of the commissioner and the local government the responsibility for maintenance may be transferred to the local government if it is authorized to assume road maintenance powers.

The department shall continue maintenance on all projects maintained by the department on January 1, 1980.

A local government may contract with the department for maintenance of a project. The maximum annual maintenance cost to the local government may not exceed twice the amount of state aid to municipalities for roads.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 11 ch 158 SLA 1980)

Sec. 19.30.221.
Availability of allocated sums.

On and after the date that the commissioner has certified the sums allocated to each local government, the sums shall be available for expenditure under the provisions of this chapter.

These allocated sums shall be available for expenditure for a period of five years after the close of the fiscal year for which the sums are authorized and any amounts so obligated remaining unexpended at the end of that period shall lapse and shall be available for other local service road or trail construction within that allocation district in accordance with AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.241

.

This section applies to sums transferred under AS

19.30.151(b)

.

The payment of royalties required to obtain materials to construct local service road and trail projects is a valid expenditure under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 12 ch 158 SLA 1980)

Sec. 19.30.231.
Payment for construction.
[Repealed,
§ 15 ch 158 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 19.30.233.
Reports. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 19.30.241.
Definitions.

In AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.241

,

“construction” means the building of a new road, street, or trail or the improvement of existing roads, streets or trails, and includes the necessary preliminary engineering, construction engineering and utility relocation;

“home rule city” means a city as defined in AS

29.04.010

;

“local government” means an organized borough of any class, a unified municipality, or a city of any class;

“local service road” means a public road that is used by an average of fewer than 750 vehicles each day and that is not designated as a route on the approved primary, urban, or interstate federal-aid highway system;

“project” means an undertaking to construct a particular portion of a local service road or trail, or, if the context so implies, the particular portion of a local service road or trail so constructed;

“secondary road” means a road that is not included in the approved federal-aid primary highway system and is being maintained by the state or local government;

“trail” means a footpath or way on land or water that is open to public use as a matter of right whether or not a thoroughfare, particularly for dog sleds and mechanized snow vehicles.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971; am § 30 ch 53 SLA 1973; am § 14 ch 158 SLA 1980; am §§ 10, 11 ch 38 SLA 1981; am §§ 45, 46 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 6, 7 ch 5 SLA 1986; am § 53 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the defined terms, and in 2008 to reflect the 1996 repeal of former paragraphs (1) and (3).

Sec. 19.30.251.
Local government powers.

Road construction and maintenance authority is granted to local governments, as defined in AS

19.30.241

, which do not otherwise have that authority; however, the authority granted is limited to participation in the construction and maintenance of local service roads under AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.241

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1971)